src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 2SYLL_VIEZZAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 6 verbs

VINFINITES_VIEZZAD ;
+Ind+Prs: EVEN_IND_PRS_VIEZZAD ;
+Ind+Prt: EVEN_IND_PRT_VIEZZAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_VIEZZAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_VIEZZAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !viežâdiđ viežâd vs viežžâd luoihâdiđ 3_KUIKETTID?
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L_CLEN ;
:â DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !viežžuuččii viežžui

LEXICON VINFINITES_VIEZZAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i%>i3 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG K ;

+PrsPrc:e%>e K ;
+PrfPrc:â%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ;

+VAbess:â^WG VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG%>n VGEN ;

+Actio+Nom:â%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:â%>mân K ;
+Actio+Com:â%>máin K ;
+Actio+Loc:â%>mist K ;
+Actio+Ess:â%>min K ;
+VAbess:â^WG^RVSH VABESS ;
+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG%>dijn K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:â%>m FLAG_3LITTER ; ! LA: removed ^VHIGH ?

LEXICON EVEN_IND_PRS_VIEZZAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:â^WG%>m K ;     ! viežâm
+Sg2:a^WG%>h K ;     ! viežah
+Sg2+Err/Orth:â^WG%>h K ;     ! viežâh
Sg3:á^VHIGH K ;       ! viäžžá
+Du1:e%>en K ;  ! viežžeen
+Du2:â%>vettee K ; ! viežžâvettee
+Du3:â%>v K ;         ! viežžâv
+Pl1:â%>p K ;	! viežžâp
+Pl2:â%>vetteđ K ;  ! viežžâvetteđ
+Pl3:i%>h K ;	! viežžih

LEXICON EVEN_IND_PRT_VIEZZAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:i%>m K ; ! viežžim
+Sg2:i%>h K ; ! viežžih
+Sg3:â^WG%>i K ; ! viežâi
+Du1:á^WG%>im K ; ! viežáim
+Du2:á^WG%>id K ; ! viežáid
+Du3:á^WG%>in K ; ! viežáin
+Pl1:â^WG%>im K ;	! viežâim
+Pl2:â^WG%>id K ; ! viežâid
+Pl3:i%>i3 K ;	! viežžii

LEXICON EVEN_POT_VIEZZAD !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^CLEN%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^CLEN%>eh K ;
+Sg3:â^WG%>š K ; ! viežâš
+Du1:â^WG%>žeen K ; ! viežâšeen
+Du2:â^WG%>švettee K ; ! viežâšvettee
+Du3:â^WG%>žává K ; ! viežâšává
+Pl1:â^WG%>žep K ; ! viežâšep
+Pl2:â^WG%>švetteđ K ; ! viežâšvetteđ
+Pl3:â^WG%>žeh K ; ! viežâseh

LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_VIEZZAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:â^WG K ; ! viežâ
+Sg3:u^WG^VHIGH%>s K ; ! viäžus
+Du1:o^VHIGH%>on K ; ! viäžžoon
+Du2:e%>e K ; ! viežžee
+Du3:u^VHIGH%>s K ; ! viäžžus
+Pl1:u^VHIGH%>p K ; ! viäžžup
+Pl2:â%>đ K ; ! viežžâđ
+Pl3:u^VHIGH%>s K ; ! viäžžus



LEXICON 2SYLL_SPELLAD
+V: 2SYLL_SPELLAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_SPELLAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_SPELLAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_SPELLAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_SPELLAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ Similar to 2SYLL_ETTAD, but less CSH, don't know yet how much. 20 verbs
VINFINITES_SPELLAD ;
+Ind+Prs: EVEN_IND_PRS_SPELLAD ;
+Ind+Prt: EVEN_IND_PRT_SPELLAD ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_ETTAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_ETTAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VHIGH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L_VERSION2 ; !Former: 3_DERIVED_VBACK does noet work
:â DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !ettum ettui lekkum terppum



LEXICON VINFINITES_SPELLAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â^VHIGH%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i3 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN%>e K ; ! trigger for u > o
+PrfPrc:â^VHIGH%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Use/NG:â%>m K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ; !tobdee NB! pargee ok

+VAbess:â^WG^VHIGH VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijn K ;
+Actio+Nom:â^VHIGH%>m NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:â^VHIGH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:â^VHIGH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:â^VHIGH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:â^VHIGH%>min K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct:â^VHIGH%>m FLAG_3LITTER ;



LEXICON EVEN_IND_PRS_SPELLAD  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Sg2:a^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Sg2+Err/Orth:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Sg3:á^VHIGH K ;       ! iätá (CSH tt-t), šadda, viggá
+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Du2:â%>vettee K ; ! etâvettee (CSH) šoddâvettee, viggâvettee
+Du3:â^VHIGH%>v K ;
+Pl1:â%>p K ;
+Pl2:â^VHIGH%>vetteđ K ;
+Pl3:i%>h K ;  ! spellih

LEXICON EVEN_IND_PRT_SPELLAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:i%>m K ;
+Sg2:i%>h K ;
+Sg3:â^WG^RLEN%>i3 K ;
+Du1:á^WG^RLEN%>im K ; ! ETTAD RLEN
+Du2:á^WG^RLEN%>id K ; ! ETTAD RLEN
+Du3:á^WG^RLEN%>in K ; ! ETTAD RLEN
+Pl1:â^WG^RLEN%>im K ;
+Pl2:â^WG^RLEN%>id K ;
+Pl3:i^CLEN%>i3 K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_VIHKAD
+V: 2SYLL_VIHKAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_VIHKAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_VIHKAD_V ;
!LEXICON 2SYLL_VIHKAD_TV
!+V+TV: 2SYLL_VIHKAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_VIHKAD_V
2SYLL_KAVNAD_V ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_ETTAD
+V: 2SYLL_ETTAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_ETTAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_ETTAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_ETTAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ 19 verbs
! ettâđ	 | eeđâm   | iä-á | eteh    | ettim  | e^RVtt4

:  VINFINITES_ETTAD ;
+Ind+Prs: EVEN_IND_PRS_ETTAD ;
+Ind+Prt: EVEN_IND_PRT_SPELLAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VHIGH%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_ETTAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_ETTAD ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VHIGH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG 3_DERIVED ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L ;
:â^CSH DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2 C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !ettum ettui lekkum terppum

LEXICON VINFINITES_ETTAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:â^VHIGH%>đ K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:â^VHIGH%>m K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH%>ččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:i^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>i3 K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN K ;
+PrsPrc:e^CLEN%>e K ; ! trigger for u > o
+PrfPrc:â^VHIGH%>m K ;
+PrfPrc+Use/NG:â%>m K ;
!+Der2+Der/NomAg:e^CLEN%> C_TAHHEE ; !tobdee NB! pargee ok

+VAbess:â^WG^VHIGH VABESS ;
+VGen:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>n VGEN ;

+Ger+PxSg1:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3+Err/Orth:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnes K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijnis K ;
+Ger:â^WG^VHIGH%>dijn K ;
+Actio+Ess:â^CSH^VHIGH%>min K ;
+Actio+Ill:â^CSH^VHIGH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:â^CSH^VHIGH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:â^CSH^VHIGH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Nom:â^VHIGH%>m NOMACT ;
!+Der4+Der/NomAct:â^VHIGH%>m FLAG_3LITTER ;

LEXICON EVEN_IND_PRS_ETTAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>m K ;
+Sg2:a^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Sg2+Err/Orth:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>h K ;
+Sg3:á^CSH^VHIGH K ;       ! iätá (CSH tt-t), šadda, viggá
+Du1:e^CLEN%>en K ;
+Du2:â^CSH%>vettee K ; ! etâvettee (CSH) šoddâvettee, viggâvettee
+Du3:â^VHIGH%>v K ;
+Pl1:â%>p K ;
+Pl2:â^CSH^VHIGH%>vetteđ K ;
+Pl3:e^CSH%>h K ;  ! loheh


LEXICON EVEN_IMPRT_ETTAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg2:â^WG^RLEN K ;
+Sg3:u^WG^VHIGH%>s K ;
+Du1:o^CLEN^VHIGH%>on K ;
+Du2:e^CLEN%>e K ;
+Du3:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>s K ;
+Pl1:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>p K ;
+Pl2:â^VHIGH%>đ K ;
+Pl3:u^CLEN^VHIGH%>s K ;

LEXICON EVEN_POT_ETTAD !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:e^WG^RLEN%>em K ;
+Sg2:e^WG^RLEN%>eh K ;
+Sg3:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>š K ;
+Du1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeen K ;
+Du2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švettee K ;
+Du3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žává K ;
+Pl1:â^WG^VHIGH%>žep K ;
+Pl2:â^WG^VHIGH^RLEN%>švetteđ K ;
+Pl3:â^WG^VHIGH%>žeh K ;


LEXICON 2SYLL_KAVNAD
+V: 2SYLL_KAVNAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV
+V+IV: 2SYLL_KAVNAD_V ;
LEXICON 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV
+V+TV: 2SYLL_KAVNAD_V ;

LEXICON 2SYLL_KAVNAD_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ as ETTAD but with VBACK, only RV ä in stem tothis lexicon 57 verbs

  VINFINITES_KAVNAD ;
+Ind: EVEN_IND_KAVNAD ;
+Cond+Prs:â^WG^VBACK%> EVEN_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: EVEN_POT_KAVNAD ;
+Imprt: EVEN_IMPRT_KAVNAD ;

+Der4+Der/InchL:â^WG^VBACK%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ;
+Der1+Der/d:âd^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; !
+Der1+Der/st:âst^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; !
+Der1+Der/tt:âtt^WG^VBACK 3_DERIVED_LOW ; !
!DERL+Der1+Der/l:âl 3_DERIVED_L_CLEN ; ! kaččâliđ
:â^VBACK DER_MAS ;
+Der3+Der/Pass:u2  C_PASS_SH_RVSH ; !
