src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
aiccâđ:ä^RVi4cc 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ; 
avkkâđ:ä^RVvkk4 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
cakkâđ:cä^RVkk4 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
ciskâđ:ci^RVsk 2SYLL_VIHKAD_IV ;
cissâđ:ci^RVss 2SYLL_SPELLAD_IV ;
elbâđ:e^RVlb 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
hastâđ:hä^RVst 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
helbâđ:he^RVlb 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
hippâđ:hi^RVpp 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
hutkâđ:hu^RVtk 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
iskâđ:i^RVsk 2SYLL_VIHKAD ;
ištâđ:i^RVšt 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
juksâđ:ju^RVk4s 2SYLL_ETTAD_TV ;
kaggâđ:kä^RVgg 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
kaidâđ:kä^RVi4d 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
kalvâđ:kä^RVlv 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
karbâđ:kä^RVrb 2SYLL_KAVNAD ; ! ML, stem ok a >ä
karsâđ:kä^RVrs 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
karttâđ:kä^RVrtt 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
kastâđ:kä^RVst 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
kavkkâđ:kä^RVvkk4 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
kavnâđ:kä^RVvn 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
kađvâđ:kä^RVđv 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
laddâđ:lä^RVdd 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
lahtâđ:lä^RVht 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
laimâđ:lä^RVi4m 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
lappâđ:lä^RVpp 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
lavdâđ:lä^RVvd 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
lavvâđ:lä^RVvv 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
lekkâđ:le^RVkk4 2SYLL_SPELLAD ; !¢leehâm liäkká
maccâđ:mä^RVcc 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ; ! cc-s ¢maacâm máccá
maizâđ:mä^RVi4z 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
maldâđ:mä^RVld 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
mattâđ:mä^RVtt 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
nalgâđ:nä^RVlg 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
njaskâđ:njä^RVsk 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
njavkkâđ:njä^RVvkk4 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
njeđgâđ:nje^RVđg 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
njipčâđ:nji^RVpč 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
oohtânservâđ:oohtân#se^RVrv 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
paccâđ:pä^RVcc 2SYLL_KAVNAD ; ! cc-c ¢paacâm páccá
paddâđ:pä^RVdd 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
paimâđ:pä^RVi4m 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
pajaluvkeččâđ:pajaluv#ke^RVčč4 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
palgâđ:pä^RVlg 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
pallâđ:pä^RVll 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
pamppâđ:pä^RVmpp 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
parnâđ:pä^RVrn 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
pekkâđ:pe^RVkk4 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
piäránkeččâđ:piärán#ke^RVčč4 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
raigâđ:rä^RVi4g 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
ravkkâđ:rä^RVvkk4 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
ristâđ:ri^RVst 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
skainâđ:skä^RVi4n 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV "nirhata" ; !
sargâđ:sä^RVrg 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
savjâđ:sä^RVvj 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
servâđ:se^RVrv 2SYLL_SPELLAD_IV ;
skalvâđ:skä^RVlv 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
skarbâđ:skä^RVrb 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
skaŋkkâđ:skä^RVŋkk 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
skirnâđ:ski^RVrn 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
skurbâđ:sku^RVrb 2SYLL_KAVNAD_TV ;
spellâđ:spe^RVll 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
srevžâđ:sre^RVvž 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
staibâđ:stä^RVi4b 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
staippâđ:stä^RVi4pp 2SYLL_KAVNAD ; ! ¢staaipâ stáippá
tabžâđ:tä^RVbž 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
tahtâđ:tä^RVht 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
taibâđ:tä^RVi4b 2SYLL_KAVNAD ; ! dáppe tiervâ
taigâđ:tä^RVi4g 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
talvâđ:tä^RVlv 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
tanccâđ:tä^RVncc 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
tarjâđ:tä^RVrj 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
teivâđ:te^RVi4v 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
telmâđ:te^RVlm 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
terppâđ:te^RVrpp 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
tevŋâđ:te^RVvŋ 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
tulvâđ:tu^RVlv 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
turšâđ:tu^RVrš 2SYLL_ETTAD ; 
utkâđ:u^RVtk4 2SYLL_ETTAD_TV ; ! ¢uuđhâm !u does not change; see hutkâđ 
vaibâđ:vä^RVi4b 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
valgâđ:vä^RVlg 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
vaskâđ:vä^RVsk 2SYLL_KAVNAD ; ! A homonymy for 2 verbs: Fi vaskata (from gold) and kinostaa
vazzâđ:vä^RVzz 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
velttâđ:ve^RVltt 2SYLL_SPELLAD_TV ;
vihkâđ:vi^RVhk 2SYLL_VIHKAD ;
vipšâđ:vi^RVpš 2SYLL_ETTAD_TV ;
čarŋâđ:čä^RVrŋ 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
časkâđ:čä^RVsk 2SYLL_KAVNAD_IV ;
čergâđ:če^RVrg 2SYLL_SPELLAD_IV ;
čihtâđ:či^RVht 2SYLL_ETTAD ;
čivgâđ:či^RVvg 2SYLL_SPELLAD ;
šipšâđ:ši^RVpš 2SYLL_ETTAD_TV ;
čalgâđ:čä^RVlg 2SYLL_KAVNAD ;
